Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
In General

§ 19-3-1.
Districts and boundaries; election of supervisors.

Each county shall be divided into five (5) districts, with due regard to equality of population and convenience of situation for the election of members of the boards of supervisors, but the districts as now existing shall continue until changed. The qualified electors of each district shall elect, at the next general election, and every four (4) years thereafter, in their districts one (1) member of the board of supervisors. Subject to the provisions of Sections 23-15-283 and 23-15-285, the board, by a three-fifths (3/5) vote of all members elected, may change the districts, the boundaries to be entered at large in the minutes of the proceedings of the board.

If the boundaries of the districts are changed by order of the board of supervisors as provided in this section, the order shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation in the county once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 51, art 5 (2); 1857, ch. 59, arts 1, 2; 1871, §§ 1348, 1349; 1880, §§ 2129, 2130; 1892, § 272; 1906, § 291; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3663; 1930, § 195; 1942, § 2870; Laws, 1920, ch. 298; Laws, 1930, ch 41; Laws, 1932, ch. 188; Laws, 1956, ch 180; Laws, 1966, ch. 290, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 564, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 493, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 425, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 353, § 2, eff October 5, 2012 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section.); Laws, 2019, ch. 340, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 19-3-3.
Eligibility of supervisors.

A person shall not be a member of the board of supervisors who is not a resident freeholder in the district for which he is chosen, and the owner of real estate of the value of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 273; 1906, § 292; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3664; 1930, § 196; 1942, § 2871; Laws, 1968, ch. 282, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 10, 1968).

§ 19-3-5.
Bond to be executed by supervisor.

Each member of the board of supervisors, before entering upon the duties of his office, shall give bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law, in a penalty equal to five percent (5%) of the sum of all the state and county taxes shown by the assessment rolls and the levies to have been collectible in the county for the year immediately preceding the commencement of the term of office of said member; however, such bond shall not exceed the amount of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00). Furthermore, any taxpayer of the county may sue on such bond for the use of the county, and such taxpayer shall be liable for all costs in case his suit shall fail. No member of the board shall be surety for any other member.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 2132; 1892, § 275; 1906, § 293; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3665; 1930, § 197; 1942, § 2871; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 15; Laws, 1991, ch. 604, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 19-3-7.
Organizational meeting.

The members of the board of supervisors, having given bond and taken the oath of office, shall meet at the courthouse of their county, on the first Monday in January next succeeding the election, and shall organize by electing one of their number to be president, and by electing one of their number to be vice-president, and, being so organized, and attended by the sheriff and clerk, the board may proceed to discharge its duties.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 51, art 5 (4); 1857, ch. 59, art 4; 1871, § 1351; 1880, § 2133; 1892, § 276; 1906, § 294; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3666; 1930, § 198; 1942, § 2873; Laws, 1959 Ex Sess ch. 22, § 1.

§ 19-3-9.
Organizational and other meetings in case of epidemics.

In case it be impracticable, in consequence of the prevalence of an epidemic at the county seat, or from other cause, for the board to meet on the first Monday in January succeeding the election, then such meeting and organization shall take place as early as it may safely be had, on the call of any three members-elect, and at such place as they may designate within the county, and for like cause any other meeting of the board of supervisors may be called by the president, or by the vice-president in the absence or disability of the president, or any three members, to meet at such place as they may designate within the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 59, art 5; 1871, § 1352; 1880, § 2134; 1892, § 277; 1906, § 295; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3667; 1930, § 199; 1942, § 2874; Laws, 1959 Ex Sess ch. 22, § 2.

§ 19-3-11.
Regular meetings in counties having one court district.

In counties having only one (1) court district, the board of supervisors shall hold regular meetings at the courthouse or in the chancery clerk’s office in those counties where the chancery clerk’s office is in a building separate from the courthouse. However, the board of supervisors may meet in any other county-owned building if such building is located within one (1) mile of the courthouse and if, more than thirty (30) days prior to changing the meeting place, the board posts a conspicuous, permanent notice to that effect in the chancery clerk’s office and in one (1) other place in the courthouse, publishes notice thereof in a newspaper published in the county, or if there be no newspaper published in the county, then in a newspaper having general circulation in the county, once each week, for at least three (3) consecutive weeks, and enters an order upon its minutes designating and describing in full the building and room to be used as the meeting room of the board of supervisors. The board of supervisors shall meet on the first Monday of each month. However, when such meeting date falls on a legal holiday, then the said meeting shall be held on the succeeding day.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 51, art 5 (5); 1857, ch. 59, art 6; 1871, § 1353; 1880, § 2135; 1892, § 278; 1906, § 296; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3668; 1930, § 200; 1942, § 2875; Laws, 1904, ch. 136; Laws, 1916, ch. 242; Laws, 1958, ch. 215, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 534, eff from and after passage (approved May 26, 1980).

§ 19-3-13.
Regular meetings in counties having two court districts.

In counties having two court districts, the board of supervisors shall hold regular meetings on the first Monday of each month; and in such counties where only one regular meeting of the board of supervisors is held in each month, the board of supervisors shall hold its first meeting in each year at the courthouse or in the chancery clerk’s office, where the chancery clerk’s office is in a building separate from the courthouse, of the first district, on the first Monday of January, and shall hold its second meeting at the courthouse or in the chancery clerk’s office, where the chancery clerk’s office is in a building separate from the courthouse, of the second district, on the first Monday of February, and shall alternate thereafter.

In counties having two court districts, the board of supervisors may hold two regular meetings in each month, and in such counties, where the board of supervisors elects to hold two regular meetings in each month, the board of supervisors shall hold its first meeting in each month at the courthouse or in the chancery clerk’s office, where the chancery clerk’s office is in a building separate from the courthouse, of the first district, on the first Monday of each month, and shall hold its second meeting at the courthouse or in the chancery clerk’s office, where the chancery clerk’s office is in a building separate from the courthouse, of the second district, on the second Monday of each month.

If the board of supervisors in any such county shall elect to hold two regular meetings in each month, as herein provided, the board shall enter an order upon its minutes to that effect and shall give at least five days’ notice thereof by posting copies of such notice at the courthouse door of each district, and after giving such notice the board shall hold regular meetings each month in each district as provided in this section.

However, in counties having two court districts where the board of supervisors has heretofore pursuant to law elected to hold two regular meetings a month, the board of supervisors may continue to hold two such regular meetings each month, as heretofore provided for, and no further order or notice of such meetings shall be required.

Moreover, in those counties having two judicial districts, where the act creating the two districts provides otherwise, the board of supervisors may continue to hold regular meetings as required by the act creating the two districts.

When any such meeting date falls on a legal holiday, then the said meeting shall be held on the succeeding day.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 279; 1906, § 297; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 3669, 3670; 1930, § 201; 1942, § 2876; Laws, 1916, ch. 242; Laws, 1958, ch. 215, § 2.

§ 19-3-15.
Meetings of board in Harrison County.

In Harrison County, a county having two judicial districts, the board of supervisors shall hold their meetings or sessions at the time required and provided for by law, alternately at Gulfport and Biloxi, respectively, at the seats of justice of the judicial districts, holding their first meeting or session as to the second judicial district, at Gulfport and their jurisdiction shall extend over the entire county at all times, just as if it were not divided into two separate districts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2910-12; Laws, 1962, ch. 257, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 19-3-17.
Length of sessions; recesses.

At regular meetings for the transaction of business, the board of supervisors may sit for a period not longer than ten days in any one month. At meetings for the transaction of business under the revenue laws, the board may continue in session as long as business may require. However, in counties having a population of more than forty thousand, and in counties having two court districts, the board may continue in session at any other regular meeting than revenue meetings for a period not longer than twelve days in any one month. Furthermore, the board of supervisors may recess from time to time, subject to the limitation herein provided, to convene on a day fixed by an order of the board entered on its minutes, and may transact any business coming before it for consideration.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 51, art 5 (5); 1857, ch. 59, art 6; 1871, § 1353; 1880, § 2135; 1892, § 278; 1906, § 296; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3668; 1930, § 202; 1942, § 2877; Laws, 1904, ch. 136; Laws, 1916, ch. 242; Laws, 1935, ch. 62; Laws, 1950, ch. 245.

§ 19-3-19.
Special, emergency and adjourned meetings.

The board of supervisors may, at a regular meeting, by an order on its minutes, adjourn to meet at any time it may determine upon.

The president, or the vice president in the absence or disability of the president, or any three (3) members of the board, may call special meetings when deemed necessary. Notice shall be given of all special meetings, for at least five (5) days, by advertisement posted at the courthouse door, or published in a newspaper of the county, and the notice thereof, whether posted or published in a newspaper, shall be entered in full on the minutes of said meeting. The notice of a special meeting, shall specify each matter of business to be transacted thereat, and at such special meetings business shall not be transacted which is not specified in the order or notice for such meeting.

The president, or the vice president in the absence or disability of the president, or any two (2) members of the board, may by written notice, call an emergency meeting of the board of supervisors in cases of an emergency arising as a result of serious damage to county property, or to roads or bridges, or emergencies arising as a result of epidemic conditions or weather conditions. The notice shall state the time of the meeting and distinctly specify the subject matters of business to be acted upon and be signed before a notary by the officer or officers calling the meeting. At least three (3) hours before the time fixed for the meeting, notice shall be personally delivered to the members of the board who have not signed it and who can be found. The notice shall also be posted at the courthouse door at least three (3) hours before the time fixed for the meeting. If a member of the board cannot be found to complete the personal delivery of the notice, the president, vice president or any one of the two (2) members of the board calling an emergency meeting shall make every attempt, within the applicable notice period, to contact the board member that was not personally found by other available means, including, but not limited to, telephone or e-mail. The method of notice used to call the meeting shall be entered on the minutes of the emergency meeting, and business not specified in the notice shall not be transacted at the meeting.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 51, art 5 (5); 1857, ch. 59, art 6; 1871, § 1353; 1880, § 2135; 1892, § 280; 1906, § 298; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3671; 1930, § 203; 1942, § 2878; Laws, 1950, ch. 243; Laws, 1959 Ex Sess ch. 22, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 354, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 19-3-21.
Presiding officer.

The president or vice-president in the absence or disability of the president, shall preside at all meetings of the board, and if they both be absent or disabled, the board may elect another member to preside during the absence of the president and vice-president.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 59, art 7; 1871, § 1354; 1880, § 2136; 1892, § 281; 1906, § 299; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3672; 1930, § 204; 1942, § 2879; Laws, 1959 Ex Sess ch. 22, § 4.

§ 19-3-23.
Quorum; fine for nonattendance.

Three (3) members of the board of supervisors shall constitute a quorum; and in case that number should not attend on the first day of any regular, adjourned or special meeting, the sheriff may adjourn the meeting from day to day until a quorum is present. A member failing to attend any meeting, having notice thereof, shall be fined Five Dollars ($5.00) per day for each day he may be absent, for which the clerk shall enter judgment nisi; and unless a sufficient excuse be made at the next meeting of the board, execution shall issue for the fine, which shall be paid into the county treasury. No allowance shall be made and no warrants shall be issued to such member until the fine and all costs are paid.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 51, art 5 (1, 9); 1857, ch. 59, art 8; 1871, § 1355; 1880, § 2137; 1892, § 282; 1906, § 300; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3673; 1930, § 205; 1942, § 2880; Laws, 1990, ch. 419, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1990).

§ 19-3-25.
Sheriff to attend meetings.

The sheriff of the county shall attend all meetings of the board of supervisors, either in person or by deputy, and shall execute all its process and orders.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 51, art 5 (7); 1857, ch. 59, art 10; 1871, § 1357; 1880, § 2139; 1892, § 284; 1906, § 302; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3675; 1930, § 208; 1942, § 2883; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 63, eff from and after January 1, 1972.

§ 19-3-27.
Duties of clerk of board of supervisors; signing of minutes.

It shall be the duty of the clerk of the board of supervisors to keep and preserve a complete and correct record of all the proceedings and orders of the board. He shall enter on the minutes the names of the members who attend at each meeting, and the names of those who fail to attend. He shall safely keep and preserve all records, books, and papers pertaining to his office, and deliver them to his successor when required. The minutes of each day’s proceedings shall either (a) be read and signed by the president or the vice president, if the president is absent or disabled so as to prevent his signing of the minutes, on or before the first Monday of the month following the day of adjournment of any term of the board of supervisors; or (b) be adopted and approved by the board of supervisors as the first order of business on the first day of the next monthly meeting of the board.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 51, art 5 (6); 1857, ch. 59, art 14; 1871, § 1361; 1880, § 2142; 1892, § 287; 1906, § 305; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3678; 1930, § 211; 1942, § 2886; Laws, 1946, ch. 305; Laws, 1959 Ex ch. 22, § 5; Laws, 1960, ch. 189; Laws, 1966, ch. 291, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 337, § 1, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 19-3-29.
Appointment of clerk pro tempore.

In case the office of clerk shall be vacant, or the clerk and his deputies be absent, refuse, or fail to perform the duties required, the board may appoint a clerk for the time, who, on taking the oath of office shall be authorized to discharge the duties and to receive the compensation, for the time being, of the clerk of the board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 59, art 15; 1871, § 1362; 1880, § 2143; 1892, § 288; 1906, § 306; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3679; 1930, § 212; 1942, § 2887.

§ 19-3-31.
Employment of office clerks in certain counties.

The board of supervisors of any county in the State of Mississippi, now or hereafter having two (2) judicial districts and an assessed valuation of property for ad valorem taxation in excess of Seventy-five Million Dollars ($75,000,000.00), according to the last completed assessment for taxation, and of any Class 3 county bordering on the Mississippi River and the State of Louisiana wherein U. S. Highway 61 and Mississippi Highway 24 intersect, is authorized to employ, in its discretion, an office clerk to maintain an office for said board of supervisors.

The board of supervisors may compensate said office clerk in such amounts as it may deem proper, said compensation to be paid from the road funds of such county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2887.5; Laws, 1958, ch. 209, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1972, ch. 334, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 13, 1972).

§ 19-3-33.
Publication of proceedings.

The board of supervisors may have its proceedings published in some newspaper published in the county, and cause the same to be paid for out of the county treasury, but the costs of such publication shall not exceed the sum fixed by law for publishing legal notices. If there be more than one newspaper published in the county, the contract for publishing the proceedings, if made, shall be let to the lowest bidder among them.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 307; 1906, § 326; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3699; 1930, § 213; 1942, § 2888.

§ 19-3-35.
Publication of proceedings; cumulative method.

The board of supervisors after each meeting shall have an itemized statement made of allowances, to whom, for what, and the amounts; a list of all contracts providing for the expenditure of money and the terms of payment thereof; a statement of all loans from sixteenth section funds, lieu land funds, and sinking, and other trust funds, setting forth to whom made, the amount, and the kind of security approved; a statement or list of all sales of timber, of all leases upon, including all leases for oil, gas and minerals upon, sixteenth section or lieu lands situated in the county or belonging to the county, showing to whom sold or made, description of land involved, the length of the term of any such lease, and the consideration therefor; and it shall also publish a recapitulation of all expenditures according to districts and also the county as a whole, and in such recapitulation the total expenses for each item shall be listed for each district, and in the total county recapitulation the total expended from each item shall be listed and same shall be published within fifteen (15) days after adjournment in some newspaper of general circulation published in the county, and if no such newspaper is published in the county, then in a newspaper published elsewhere in the state and having a general circulation in such county. The cost of publishing the same shall be paid for out of the general fund of the county. The cost of such publication shall not exceed one-half ( 1/2) of the rate now fixed by law for publishing legal notices, and in no event shall the cost of such publication exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) in any one (1) month, save, however, in counties of classes 1 and 2 the board of supervisors may expend an amount not to exceed One Hundred Seventy-five Dollars ($175.00) per month for the publication of said cumulative digest of its proceedings as provided for above. If there be more than one newspaper published in the county, the board of supervisors shall advertise, as provided by law, for contracts for publishing such proceedings, and shall award the contract to the lowest bidder for a period of two (2) years. If no bid be made for the price above mentioned, then the proceedings shall be posted at the courthouse door as hereinafter provided. If there be no newspaper published in such county, then such proceedings shall be posted at the front courthouse door.

If any member of a board of supervisors or the chancery clerk shall fail, refuse or neglect to comply with the provisions of this section, he shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for such failure, refusal or neglect for each offense and, in addition thereto, shall be liable to a penalty of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), recoverable on his official bond by suit filed by any county or district attorney or any interested citizen, upon his official bond.

This shall not be construed to repeal Section 19-3-33, and where the verbatim proceedings are published as therein provided, this section shall not apply, it being intended hereby to provide a method of publishing the proceedings of the board of supervisors in addition to that now provided for by Section 19-3-33. Where publication is made under Section 19-3-33, this section shall not be construed so as to require any other and additional publication, or notice.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2889; Laws, 1932, ch. 190; Laws, 1938, ch. 324; Laws, 1946, ch. 418; Laws, 1948, ch. 425; Laws, 1958, ch. 218; Laws, 1980, ch. 333, eff from and after October 1, 1980.

§ 19-3-37.
Privileges of supervisors.

Each member of the board of supervisors shall, during his term of office, be exempt from working on the roads, from serving in the militia, and from jury service.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 59, art 11; 1871, § 1358; 1880, § 2140; 1892, § 285; 1906, § 303; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3676; 1930, § 209; 1942, § 2884.

§ 19-3-39.
Supervisors are conservators of the peace.

The members of the board of supervisors are conservators of the peace within their respective counties, and shall possess all the powers as such which belong to, or are conferred on, justices of the peace.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 59, art 12; 1871, § 1359; 1880, § 2141; 1892, § 286; 1906, § 304; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3677; 1930, § 210; 1942, § 2885.

§ 19-3-40.
Power of board to adopt, modify, alter, or repeal orders, resolutions or ordinances not inconsistent with law.

The board of supervisors of any county shall have the power to adopt any orders, resolutions or ordinances with respect to county affairs, property and finances, for which no specific provision has been made by general law and which are not inconsistent with the Mississippi Constitution, the Mississippi Code of 1972, or any other statute or law of the State of Mississippi; and any such board shall likewise have the power to alter, modify and repeal such orders, resolutions or ordinances. Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the powers granted to boards of supervisors in this section are complete without the existence of or reference to any specific authority granted in any other statute or law of the State of Mississippi.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, such orders, resolutions or ordinances shall apply countywide unless the governing authorities of any municipality situated within a county adopt any order, resolution or ordinance governing the same general subject matter. In such case the municipal order, resolution or ordinance shall govern within the corporate limits of the municipality.

In any county where U.S. Interstate 20 and U.S. Highway 49 intersect, having a population of greater than one hundred forty-one thousand (141,000) but less than one hundred fifty-one thousand (151,000) according to the 2010 federal decennial census , the board of supervisors may adopt orders, resolutions and ordinances under subsection (1) of this section for a clearly defined geographic area. The order, resolution or ordinance shall describe the affected geographic area by zoning district, section lines or other discernable boundaries. The order, resolution or ordinance also shall state specific findings to support its purpose and need within the geographic area.

This section shall not authorize the board of supervisors of a county to (a) levy taxes other than those authorized by statute or increase the levy of any authorized tax beyond statutorily established limits, (b) issue bonds of any kind, (c) change the requirements, practices or procedures for county elections or establish any new elective office, (d) use any public funds, equipment, supplies or materials for any private purpose, (e) regulate common carrier railroads, (f) grant any donation, or (g) without prior legislative approval, regulate, directly or indirectly, the amount of rent charged for leasing private residential property in which the county does not have a property interest; unless such actions are specifically authorized by another statute or law of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 60; Laws, 1989, ch. 526, § 2; reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 418, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 478, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 19-3-41.
Jurisdiction and powers generally.

The boards of supervisors shall have within their respective counties full jurisdiction over roads, ferries and bridges, except as otherwise provided by Section 170 of the Constitution, and all other matters of county police. They shall have jurisdiction over the subject of paupers. They shall have power to levy such taxes as may be necessary to meet the demands of their respective counties, upon such persons and property as are subject to state taxes for the time being, not exceeding the limits that may be prescribed by law. They shall cause to be erected and kept in good repair, in their respective counties, a good and convenient courthouse and a jail. A courthouse shall be erected and kept in good repair in each judicial district and a jail may be erected in each judicial district. They may close a jail in either judicial district, at their discretion, where one (1) jail will suffice. They shall have the power, in their discretion, to prohibit or regulate the sale and use of firecrackers, roman candles, torpedoes, skyrockets, and any and all explosives commonly known and referred to as fireworks, outside the confines of municipalities. They shall have and exercise such further powers as are or shall be conferred upon them by law. They shall have authority to negotiate with and contract with licensed real estate brokers for the purpose of advertising and showing and procuring prospective purchasers for county-owned real property offered for sale in accordance with the provisions of Section 19-7-3.

The board of supervisors of any county, in its discretion, may contract with a private attorney or private collection agent or agency to collect any type of delinquent payment owed to the county including, but not limited to, past-due fees, fines and assessments, delinquent ad valorem taxes on personal property and delinquent ad valorem taxes on mobile homes that are entered as personal property on the mobile home rolls, collection fees associated with the disposal or collection of garbage, rubbish and solid waste, or with the district attorney of the circuit court district in which the county is located to collect any delinquent fees, fines and other assessments. Any such contract may provide for payment contingent upon successful collection efforts or payment based upon a percentage of the delinquent amount collected; however, the entire amount of all delinquent payments collected shall be remitted to the county and shall not be reduced by any collection costs or fees. There shall be due to the county from any person whose delinquent payment is collected pursuant to a contract executed under this subsection an amount, in addition to the delinquent payment, of not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the delinquent payment for collections made within this state and not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the delinquent payment for collections made outside of this state. However, in the case of delinquent fees owed to the county for garbage or rubbish collection or disposal, only the amount of the delinquent fees, which may include an additional amount not to exceed up to One Dollar ($1.00) or ten percent (10%) per month, whichever is greater, on the current monthly bill on the balance of delinquent monthly fees as prescribed under Sections 19-5-21 and 19-5-22, may be collected and no amount in addition to such delinquent fees may be collected if the board of supervisors of the county has notified the county tax collector under Section 19-5-22 for the purpose of prohibiting the issuance of a motor vehicle road and bridge privilege license tag to the person delinquent in the payment of such fees. Any private attorney or private collection agent or agency contracting with the county under the provisions of this subsection shall give bond or other surety payable to the county in such amount as the board of supervisors deems sufficient. Any private attorney with whom the county contracts under the provisions of this subsection must be a member in good standing of The Mississippi Bar. Any private collection agent or agency with whom the county contracts under the provisions of this subsection must meet all licensing requirements for doing business in the State of Mississippi. Neither the county nor any officer or employee of the county shall be liable, civilly or criminally, for any wrongful or unlawful act or omission of any person or business with whom the county has contracted under the provisions of this subsection. The Mississippi Department of Audit shall establish rules and regulations for use by counties in contracting with persons or businesses under the provisions of this subsection.

In addition to the authority granted under subsection (2) of this section, the board of supervisors of any county, in its discretion, may contract with one or more of the constables of the county to collect delinquent criminal fines imposed in the justice court of the county. Any such contract shall provide for payment contingent upon successful collection efforts, and the amount paid to a constable may not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount which the constable collects. The entire amount of all delinquent criminal fines collected under such a contract shall be remitted by the constable to the clerk of the justice court for deposit into the county general fund as provided under Section 9-11-19. Any payments made to a constable pursuant to a contract executed under the provisions of this section may be paid only after presentation to and approval by the board of supervisors of the county.

If a county uses its own employees to collect any type of delinquent payment owed to the county, then from and after July 1, 1999, the county may charge an additional fee for collection of the delinquent payment provided the payment has been delinquent for ninety (90) days. The collection fee may not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the delinquent payment if the collection is made within this state and may not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the delinquent payment if the collection is made outside this state. In conducting collection of delinquent payments, the county may utilize credit cards or electronic fund transfers. The county may pay any service fees for the use of such methods of collection from the collection fee, but not from the delinquent payment.

In addition to such authority as is otherwise granted under this section, the board of supervisors of any county may expend funds necessary to maintain and repair, and to purchase liability insurance, tags and decals for, any personal property acquired under the Federal Excess Personal Property Program and the Firefighter Property Program that is used by the local volunteer fire department.

The board of supervisors of any county, in its discretion, may expend funds to provide for training and education of newly elected or appointed county officials before the beginning of the term of office or employment of such officials. Any expenses incurred for such purposes may be allowed only upon prior approval of the board of supervisors. Any payments or reimbursements made under the provisions of this subsection may be paid only after presentation to and approval by the board of supervisors.

The board of supervisors of any county may expend funds to purchase, maintain and repair equipment for the electronic filing and storage of filings, files, instruments, documents and records using microfilm, microfiche, data processing, magnetic tape, optical discs, computers or other electronic process which correctly and legibly stores and reproduces or which forms a medium for storage, copying or reproducing documents, files and records for use by one (1), all or any combination of county offices, employees and officials, whether appointed or elected.

In addition to the authority granted in this section, the board of supervisors of any county may expend funds as provided in Section 29-3-23(2).

The board of supervisors of any county may perform and exercise any duty, responsibility or function, may enter into agreements and contracts, may provide and deliver any services or assistance, and may receive, expend and administer any grants, gifts, matching funds, loans or other monies, in accordance with and as may be authorized by any federal law, rule or regulation creating, establishing or providing for any program, activity or service. The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed as authorizing any county, the board of supervisors of any county or any member of a board of supervisors to perform any function or activity that is specifically prohibited under the laws of this state or as granting any authority in addition to or in conflict with the provisions of any federal law, rule or regulation.

The board of supervisors of any county may provide funds from any available source to assist in defraying the actual expenses to maintain an office as provided in Section 9-1-36. The authority provided in this subsection shall apply to any office regardless of ownership of such office or who may be making any lease payments for such office.

The board of supervisors of any county may reimburse the cost of an insured’s deductible for an automobile insurance coverage claim if the claim has been paid for damages to the insured’s property arising from the negligence of a duly authorized officer, agent, servant, attorney or employee of the county in the performance of his or her official duties, and the officer, agent, servant, attorney or employee owning or operating the motor vehicle is protected by immunity under the Mississippi Tort Claims Act, Section 11-46-1 et seq.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 51, art 5 (3); 1857, ch. 59, art 16; 1871, § 1363; 1880, § 2144; 1892, § 289; 1906, § 307; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3680; 1930, § 214; 1942, § 2890; Laws, 1896, ch. 132; Laws, 1956, ch. 204; Laws, 1987, ch. 383; Laws, 1990, ch. 532, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 455, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 30; Laws, 1995, ch. 496, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 550, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 482, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 369, § 3; Laws, 1999, ch. 516, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 363, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 515, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 534, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 517, § 3; Laws, 2014, ch. 432, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 410, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 6, 2017.); Laws, 2018, ch. 302, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 19-3-42.
Maintenance of private roads and driveways used for school bus turnarounds; public school grounds; driveways and parking lots of nonprofit organizations.

The board of supervisors of any county is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to grade, gravel or shell, repair, and/or maintain private gravel or shell roads or driveways to private residences if such roads or driveways are used for school bus turnarounds.

Prior to engaging in the work authorized in subsection (1) of this section, the board of supervisors shall spread upon the official minutes of the board:

The written request of the school board for such work;

The written approval of the board of supervisors for such work;

The specific location of the road or driveway to be worked; and

The name of the owner of the road or driveway to be worked.

The written request of the school board, as required in subsection (2)(a) above, shall contain a current list of all active school bus turnarounds presently in use by the school district or contemplated for use by the school district for the present school year. The approval by the board of supervisors shall be valid and effective for the period of time that a turnaround is anticipated for use, but in no event for a period greater than one (1) year.

In addition to the authority granted in subsection (1) of this section, from and after October 1, 1989, the board of supervisors of any county is further authorized, in its discretion, to maintain public school grounds of the county and to grade, gravel, shell or overlay, and/or to maintain gravel, shell, asphalt or concrete roads, driveways or parking lots of public schools of the county if, before engaging in such work, the board of supervisors shall spread upon its official minutes the written request of the school board for such work, the written approval of the board of supervisors for such work and the specific location of the school grounds or road, driveway or parking lot, to be worked.

In addition to any other authority granted in this section, the board of supervisors of any county is hereby authorized, in its discretion, to repair and maintain driveways and parking lots of: (a) any nonprofit organization in the county which is tax exempt under Section 501(c) of the United States Internal Revenue Code and which has as one (1) of its primary purposes for organization to aid and assist in the rehabilitation of persons suffering from drug abuse or drug addiction; and (b) any private, nonprofit cemeteries in the county. The board of supervisors of any county shall not be authorized under the provisions of this subsection to repair or maintain driveways or parking lots located more than one hundred fifty (150) feet from the center of any highway, road or street under the jurisdiction of the county.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 493, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 422, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 541, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 368, § 1, eff from and after October 1, 1990.